District of Columbia statutes.
1-129.21

Definitions.

For the purposes of this subpart, the term:

(1)

“Commission” means the New Columbia Statehood Commission established pursuant to § 1-129.31.

(2)

“Fund” means the New Columbia Statehood Fund established pursuant to § 1-129.32.

(3)

“Statehood Delegation” means, collectively, the United States Representative and the 2 United States Senators holding office pursuant to § 1-123.

(4)

“Statehood Fund” means the fund established by each United States Senator and United States Representative pursuant to § 1-123(g), and overseen by the Office of Campaign Finance.

(5)

“United States Representative” means the District of Columbia public official elected pursuant to § 1-123 to the office of Representative.

(6)

“United States Senator” means either of the 2 District of Columbia public officials elected pursuant to § 1-123 to the office of Senator.

History

Mar. 10, 1981, D.C. Law 3-171, § 11 [23]
as added May 2, 2015, D.C. Law 20-271, § 101(b), 62 DCR 1884

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) addition of this subpart, see § 101(b) of the New Columbia Statehood Initiative, Omnibus Boards and Commissions, and Election Transition Reform Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-7, Feb. 26, 2015, 62 DCR 2646, 21 STAT 807).
For temporary (90 days) requirement that the Commission issue a report with findings as to whether the Statehood Delegation should receive compensation in the form of a salary or stipend, see § 105 of the New Columbia Statehood Initiative, Omnibus Boards and Commissions, and Election Transition Reform Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-7, Feb. 26, 2015, 62 DCR 2646, 21 STAT 807).

Editor's Notes

Section 105 of D.C. Law 20-271 provided that, within 60 days of May 2, 2015, the Commission shall issue a report with findings as to whether the Statehood Delegation should receive compensation in the form of a salary or stipend and, if so, the appropriate amount of such compensation.